Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 9A.56.150 and 2009 c 431 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person is guilty of possessing stolen property in the first degree if he or she possesses stolen property, other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 or a motor vehicle, which ((exceeds)):(a) Exceeds five thousand dollars in value; or(b) Was property or equipment used by firefighters or emergency medical service providers that is critical to their work in an emergency setting and taken from a fire station, fire department vehicle, or emergency medical services building, facility, structure, or vehicle; and(i) The loss of the property or equipment significantly hindered or delayed the firefighter's or emergency medical service provider's ability to respond to an ongoing emergency; or(ii) The property or equipment exceeds $1,000 in value.(2) Possessing stolen property in the first degree is a class B felony.Sec. 2. RCW 9A.56.030 and 2017 c 266 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in RCW 9A.56.400, a person is guilty of theft in the first degree if he or she commits theft of:(a) Property or services which exceed(s) five thousand dollars in value other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010;(b) Property of any value, other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 or a motor vehicle, taken from the person of another;(c) A search and rescue dog, as defined in RCW 9.91.175, while the search and rescue dog is on duty; ((or))(d) Commercial metal property, nonferrous metal property, or private metal property, ((as those terms are defined in RCW 19.290.010,)) and the costs of the damage to the owner's property exceed five thousand dollars in value; or(e) Property or equipment used by firefighters or emergency medical service providers that is critical to their work in an emergency setting and taken from a fire station, fire department vehicle, or emergency medical services building, facility, structure, or vehicle; and(i) The loss of the property or equipment significantly hindered or delayed the firefighter's or emergency medical service provider's ability to respond to an ongoing emergency; or(ii) The property or equipment exceeds $1,000 in value.(2) Theft in the first degree is a class B felony.--- END ---